Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3830
(UTC 404) Trust purposes.

(UTC 404) A trust may be created only to the extent its purposes are lawful, not contrary to public policy, and possible to achieve. A trust and its terms must be for the benefit of its beneficiaries.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 30.